Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Medical Practice
§ 1368.
Data repository; licensee profiles.

A data repository is created within the Department of Health that will be responsible for the compilation of all data required under this section, under this chapter, and under any other law or rule that requires the reporting of such information. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, licensees shall promptly report and the Department shall collect the following information to create individual profiles on all health care professionals licensed, certified, or registered by the Department, pursuant to the provisions of this title, in a format created by the Department that shall be available for dissemination to the public:

A description of any criminal convictions for felonies and serious misdemeanors, as determined by the Commissioner of Health, within the most recent 10 years. For the purposes of this subdivision, a person shall be deemed to be convicted of a crime if he or she pleaded guilty or was found or adjudged guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction.

A description of any charges to which a health care professional pleads nolo contendere or where sufficient facts of guilt were found and the matter was continued without a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction.

A description of any formal charges served, findings, conclusions, and orders of the licensing authority, and final disposition of matters by the courts within the most recent 10 years, and a summary of the final disposition of such matters indicating any charges that were dismissed and any charges resulting in a finding of unprofessional conduct.
(3) (A) A description of any formal charges served, findings, conclusions, and orders of the licensing authority, and final disposition of matters by the courts within the most recent 10 years, and a summary of the final disposition of such matters indicating any charges that were dismissed and any charges resulting in a finding of unprofessional conduct.

The Department shall remove from the data repository any charges, findings, conclusions, and order if the final disposition of the matter dismissed all charges filed against the licensee in the same action. The Department shall ensure that the period for appealing an order has expired prior to removing any such information from the data repository, and shall remove that information within five business days of the expiration of the appeal period.

A description of any formal charges served by licensing authorities, findings, conclusions, and orders of such licensing authorities, and final disposition of matters by the courts in other states within the most recent 10 years.
(4) (A) A description of any formal charges served by licensing authorities, findings, conclusions, and orders of such licensing authorities, and final disposition of matters by the courts in other states within the most recent 10 years.

Upon request of the licensee, the Department shall remove from the data repository any charges, findings, conclusions, and order if the final disposition of the matter dismissed all charges filed against the licensee in the same action. The Department shall confirm the dismissal and shall ensure that the period for appealing an order has expired prior to removing any such information from the data repository, and shall remove that information within five business days of the expiration of the appeal period or within five business days of the request of the licensee, whichever is later.

A description of revocation or involuntary restriction of hospital privileges for reasons related to competence or character that has been issued by the hospital’s governing body or any other official of the hospital after procedural due process has been afforded, or the resignation from, or nonrenewal of, medical staff membership or the restriction of privileges at a hospital taken in lieu of, or in settlement of, a pending disciplinary case related to competence or character in that hospital. Only cases that have occurred within the most recent 10 years shall be disclosed by the Board to the public.

All medical malpractice court judgments and all medical malpractice arbitration awards in which a payment is awarded to a complaining party during the last 10 years, and all settlements of medical malpractice claims in which a payment is made to a complaining party within the last 10 years. Dispositions of paid claims shall be reported in a minimum of three graduated categories, indicating the level of significance of the award or settlement, if valid comparison data are available for the profession or specialty. Information concerning paid medical malpractice claims shall be put in context by comparing an individual health care professional’s medical malpractice judgment awards and settlements to the experience of other health care professionals within the same specialty within the New England region or nationally. The Commissioner may, in consultation with the Vermont Medical Society, report comparisons of individual health care professionals covered under this section to all similar health care professionals within the New England region or nationally.
(6) (A) All medical malpractice court judgments and all medical malpractice arbitration awards in which a payment is awarded to a complaining party during the last 10 years, and all settlements of medical malpractice claims in which a payment is made to a complaining party within the last 10 years. Dispositions of paid claims shall be reported in a minimum of three graduated categories, indicating the level of significance of the award or settlement, if valid comparison data are available for the profession or specialty. Information concerning paid medical malpractice claims shall be put in context by comparing an individual health care professional’s medical malpractice judgment awards and settlements to the experience of other health care professionals within the same specialty within the New England region or nationally. The Commissioner may, in consultation with the Vermont Medical Society, report comparisons of individual health care professionals covered under this section to all similar health care professionals within the New England region or nationally.

Comparisons of malpractice payment data shall be accompanied by:

an explanation of the fact that professionals treating certain patients and performing certain procedures are more likely to be the subject of litigation than others;

a statement that the report reflects data for the last 10 years, and the recipient should take into account the number of years the professional has been in practice when considering the data;

an explanation that an incident giving rise to a malpractice claim may have occurred years before any payment was made, due to the time lawsuits take to move through the legal system;

an explanation of the possible effect of treating high-risk patients on a professional’s malpractice history; and

an explanation that malpractice cases may be settled for reasons other than liability.

Information concerning all settlements shall be accompanied by the following statement: “Settlement of a claim may occur for a variety of reasons that do not necessarily reflect negatively on the professional competence or conduct of the health care professional. A payment in settlement of a medical malpractice action or claim should not be construed as creating a presumption that medical malpractice has occurred.” Nothing in this subdivision (6) shall be construed to limit or prevent the licensing authority from providing further explanatory information regarding the significance of categories in which settlements are reported.
(C) (i) Information concerning all settlements shall be accompanied by the following statement: “Settlement of a claim may occur for a variety of reasons that do not necessarily reflect negatively on the professional competence or conduct of the health care professional. A payment in settlement of a medical malpractice action or claim should not be construed as creating a presumption that medical malpractice has occurred.” Nothing in this subdivision (6) shall be construed to limit or prevent the licensing authority from providing further explanatory information regarding the significance of categories in which settlements are reported.

Pending malpractice claims and actual amounts paid by or on behalf of a professional in connection with a malpractice judgment, award, or settlement shall not be disclosed by the Commissioner of Health or by the licensing authority to the public. Nothing in this subdivision (6) shall be construed to prevent the licensing authority from investigating and disciplining a health care professional on the basis of medical malpractice claims that are pending.

The names of medical professional schools and dates of graduation.

Graduate medical education.

Specialty board certification.

The number of years in practice.

The names of the hospitals where the health care professional has privileges.

Appointments to medical school or professional school faculties, and indication as to whether the health care professional has had a responsibility for teaching graduate medical education within the last 10 years.

Information regarding publications in peer-reviewed medical literature within the last 10 years.

Information regarding professional or community service activities and awards.

The location of the health care professional’s primary practice setting.

The identification of any translating services that may be available at the health care professional’s primary practice location.

An indication of whether the health care professional participates in the Medicaid program, and is currently accepting new patients.

The Department shall provide individual health care professionals with a copy of their profiles prior to the initial release to the public and each time a physician’s profile is modified or amended. A health care professional shall be provided a reasonable time to correct factual inaccuracies that appear in such profile, and may elect to have his or her profile omit the information required under subdivisions (a)(12) through (14) of this section. In collecting information for such profiles and in disseminating the same, the Department shall inform health care professionals that they may choose not to provide such information required under subdivisions (a)(12) through (14).

The profile shall include the following conspicuous statement: “This profile contains information that may be used as a starting point in evaluating the professional. This profile should not, however, be your sole basis for selecting a professional.”

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2013, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2015;

2015, No. 23

, § 14;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 165.

§ 1369.
Repealed. 2013, No. 42, § 3.

§ 1370.
Complaints; investigative committee.

Any individual, organization, or public officer may submit a written complaint to the Board alleging that any individual practicing medicine in the State committed unprofessional conduct or that an individual practiced without being licensed in violation of section 1314 of this chapter. The complaint shall specify the grounds on which the allegations of unprofessional conduct are based.
(a) (1) Any individual, organization, or public officer may submit a written complaint to the Board alleging that any individual practicing medicine in the State committed unprofessional conduct or that an individual practiced without being licensed in violation of section 1314 of this chapter. The complaint shall specify the grounds on which the allegations of unprofessional conduct are based.

A person or organization shall not be liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the good faith reporting of information to the Board about alleged incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a licensee.

The Board shall initiate an investigation of the individual complained against whenever a complaint is received. The Board may also act on its own initiative without having received a complaint.
(b) (1) The Board shall initiate an investigation of the individual complained against whenever a complaint is received. The Board may also act on its own initiative without having received a complaint.

The Executive Director shall designate three or more members, including at least one public member, to serve as an investigative committee to investigate and report to the Board its findings regarding the complaint and whether an evidentiary hearing is warranted. If there is an insufficient number of members to investigate a complaint by reason of disqualification, resignation, vacancy, or necessary absence, the Commissioner of Health may, at the request of the Board, appoint ad hoc members to serve on the investigative committee for that matter only.

If the investigative committee determines that an evidentiary hearing is warranted, the Executive Director shall prepare a specification of the charge or charges of unprofessional conduct made against the individual licensed by the Board, a copy of which shall be served upon the subject of the charge or charges, together with the notice of hearing set forth in subsection 1372(b) of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1371.
Access to documents; discovery.

A licensee who is notified that a specification of one or more charges of unprofessional conduct have been made against the individual in accordance with subdivision 1370(b)(3) of this chapter shall be entitled to inspect and copy all information in the possession of the Department of Health pertaining to the licensee, except:
(a) (1) A licensee who is notified that a specification of one or more charges of unprofessional conduct have been made against the individual in accordance with subdivision 1370(b)(3) of this chapter shall be entitled to inspect and copy all information in the possession of the Department of Health pertaining to the licensee, except:

investigatory files that have not resulted in charges of unprofessional conduct;

materials that constitute attorney work product; and

any other document or information that the Board has an obligation to protect from disclosure.

The Executive Director shall notify the licensee of the right to inspect and copy information as provided in subsection 1372(b) of this chapter.

A licensee who is notified that a specification of one or more charges of unprofessional conduct have been made against the individual in accordance with subdivision 1370(b)(3) of this chapter shall be entitled to produce fact witnesses, expert witnesses, and evidence on the licensee’s own behalf, to cross-examine witnesses testifying against the licensee, and to engage in other methods of discovery as set forth by order of the Board or its hearing officer.

A licensee who is notified that a specification of one or more charges of unprofessional conduct have been made against the individual in accordance with subdivision 1370(b)(3) of this chapter shall be entitled to request to depose witnesses by motion to the Board or its hearing officer. Any deposition so ordered shall be subject to:

the provisions of section 1376 of this chapter, relating to confidentiality and the inadmissibility of certain evidence;

limitations or conditions necessary to protect witnesses who are minors or who are adults subject to a guardianship or conservatorship; and

such other reasonable limitations as the Board or its hearing officer may provide in the interests of justice and consistent with the provisions of

3 V.S.A. § 810

, relating to rules of evidence and official notice in contested cases.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1372.
Hearing panel.

Composition of hearing panel.

The Executive Director may designate a hearing panel constituting less than a quorum of the Board to conduct hearings that would otherwise be heard by the full Board. A hearing panel shall consist of at least three members, including at least one physician member of the Board and at least one public member of the Board. No member of the hearing panel shall have been a member of the investigative committee that reviewed the matter at the investigative stage. A party may move to disqualify a member of a hearing panel due to a conflict of interest.

If there is an insufficient number of members to serve on a hearing panel by reason of disqualification, resignation, vacancy, or necessary absence, the Commissioner of Health may, at the request of the Board, appoint ad hoc members to serve on the hearing panel for that matter only.

Time and notice of hearing.

The Executive Director or a hearing officer shall set a time for the evidentiary hearing as soon as convenient following the determination by the investigative committee that an evidentiary hearing is warranted, subject to the discovery needs of the parties as established in any prehearing or discovery conference or in any orders regulating discovery and depositions, or both, but no earlier than 30 days after service of the charge upon the individual complained against. A party may file motions to extend the time of the hearing for good cause.

The Executive Director shall issue a notice of the evidentiary hearing on the charges, which notice shall specify the time and place of the hearing and shall notify the individual complained against that he or she may file with the Executive Director a written response within 20 days of the date of service. The notice shall also notify the individual complained against that a record of the proceeding will be kept, that he or she will have the right to inspect and copy information as set forth in section 1371 of this chapter, and that he or she will have the opportunity to appear personally and to have counsel present, with the right to produce witnesses and evidence on his or her own behalf, to cross-examine witnesses testifying against him or her, and to examine such documentary evidence as may be produced against him or her.

Hearing panel report. Within 60 days after holding an evidentiary hearing under this section, unless the Board grants an extension, the hearing panel shall provide a written report of its findings of fact and its recommendations to the full Board, with a transcript of the evidence.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1373.
Hearing before the Board.

If the Board deems it necessary, following receipt of the report of the hearing panel pursuant to section 1372 of this chapter and after further notice to the individual complained against, the Board may take additional evidence at a hearing before the Board, which shall be conducted according to the same process as provided for the hearing panel.

Five members of the Board, including at least one physician member and at least one public member, shall constitute a quorum for purposes of this section.
(b) (1) Five members of the Board, including at least one physician member and at least one public member, shall constitute a quorum for purposes of this section.

Members of the investigative committee designated pursuant to section 1370 of this chapter shall not sit with the Board when it conducts hearings under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1374.
Decision and order.

Regardless of whether the Board makes its determination on the findings of the hearing panel pursuant to section 1372 of this chapter alone, on the findings of the hearing panel as supplemented by a hearing before the Board pursuant to section 1373 of this chapter, or on its own findings, the Board shall render its decision on the merits of the charge or charges on the basis of the evidence in the record before it.

If a majority of the members of the Board present and voting find that the individual complained against committed unprofessional conduct as specified in one or more of the charges, the Board shall prepare written findings of fact, conclusions, and an order, copies of which shall be served upon the individual complained against.
(b) (1) If a majority of the members of the Board present and voting find that the individual complained against committed unprofessional conduct as specified in one or more of the charges, the Board shall prepare written findings of fact, conclusions, and an order, copies of which shall be served upon the individual complained against.

In its order, the Board may do one or more of the following:

reprimand the individual complained against;

(iii)

take such other action relating to discipline or practice as the Board determines appropriate, including imposing an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for each act that constitutes an unprofessional conduct violation.

condition, limit, suspend, or revoke the license, certificate, or practice of the individual complained against; or

Any monies received from the imposition of an administrative penalty imposed pursuant to this subdivision (2) shall be deposited into the Board of Medical Practice Regulatory Fee Fund for the purpose of providing education and training for Board members and licensees. The Commissioner of Health’s accounting under section 1351 of this chapter shall detail the receipts of administrative penalties and the purposes for which such monies were used.

If the Board finds the individual complained against not guilty of the charge or charges, or the charges against the individual are dismissed, the Board shall promptly order a dismissal of the charges and issue a statement that the charges were not proved.

Any order issued by the Board under this section shall be in full force and effect until further order of the Board or of a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1375.
Subpoenas; contempt.

The Board may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses at any investigation or hearing.

The Board shall issue subpoenas on behalf of the individual complained against at the request of such person.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1376.
Confidentiality; inadmissibility of certain evidence.

A hearing panel or the Board, or both, may close portions of a hearing or hearings to the public if the panel or Board deems it appropriate in order to protect the confidentiality of an individual or for medical and other protected health information pertaining to any identifiable person that is otherwise confidential under State or federal law.

In any proceeding under section 1372 or 1373 of this chapter that addresses an applicant’s or licensee’s alleged sexual misconduct, evidence of the sexual history of a victim of the alleged sexual misconduct shall neither be subject to discovery nor be admitted into evidence. Neither opinion evidence nor evidence of the reputation of a victim’s sexual conduct shall be admitted. At the request of a victim, a hearing panel or the Board may close portions of hearings to the public if the panel or Board deems it appropriate in order to protect the identity of a victim and the confidentiality of his or her medical records.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1377. Section 1377 effective upon occurrence of contingency. Nondisciplinary financial penalty.

For violations of statutes and Board rules of an administrative nature, the Board may, in its sole discretion, elect to offer a licensee the opportunity to pay a nondisciplinary financial penalty of not more than $250.00 for each instance of noncompliance. If the licensee accepts the offer and submits the required payment, the matter shall be considered to be closed in lieu of investigating the failure to comply with the rule or statute as unprofessional conduct.

A matter closed by payment of a nondisciplinary financial penalty shall not be considered to be a disciplinary action, and the matter shall remain confidential in the manner of dismissed charges in accordance with section 1318 of this chapter.

The Board shall not be required to offer the option of a nondisciplinary financial penalty in any particular case and may elect to process any matter as a disciplinary action.

Any monies received from nondisciplinary financial penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Board of Medical Practice Regulatory Fee Fund for the purpose of providing education and training for Board members and licensees.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.